Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1171.
do enact as follows:AB1171,11Section 1. 940.225 (2) (k) of the statutes is renumbered 940.225 (2) (k) 1. 2(intro.) and amended to read:AB1171,2,43940.225 (2) (k) 1. (intro.) Is a law enforcement officer and has sexual contact 4or sexual intercourse with any person of the following persons:AB1171,2,85a. A person who is detained by any law enforcement officer, as provided under 6s. 968.24, or is in the custody of any law enforcement officer. This paragraph subd. 71. a. applies whether the custody is lawful or unlawful and whether the detainment 8or custody is actual or constructive.AB1171,2,992. Consent is not an issue in an action under this paragraph subd. 1.AB1171,210Section 2. 940.225 (2) (k) 1. b. and c. of the statutes are created to read:AB1171,2,1211940.225 (2) (k) 1. b. A person who the law enforcement officer knows is a 12victim, witness, or suspect in any open criminal investigation.AB1171,2,1413c. A person whom the law enforcement officer contacts in the exercise of the 14law enforcement officer’s official duties.AB1171,2,1515